Virginia statutes. Title 11. Contracts.
Chapter 2. Compromise and Satisfaction.

§ 11-10.
Compromise by creditor with co-obligor, etc.

A creditor may compound or compromise with any joint contractor or co-obligor, and release him from all liability on his contract or obligation, without impairing the contract or obligation as to the other joint contractors or co-obligors.

History.

Code 1919, § 5763.

Law Review.

For article, “The Duty to Settle,” see 76 Va. L. Rev. 1113 (1990).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Release, § 8.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 5 Parties. § 5.04 Contract Actions. Friend.

§ 11-11.
Crediting contract; surety.

When such compounding or compromise is made, the contract or obligation shall be credited with a full share of the party released, except where the compounding or compromise is with a surety or cosurety, and in that case, as between the creditor and principal, the credit shall be for the sum actually paid by the compounding debtor.

History.

Code 1919, § 5764.

§ 11-12.
Part performance extinguishing obligation.

Part performance of an obligation, promise or undertaking, either before or after a breach thereof, when expressly accepted by the creditor in satisfaction and rendered in pursuance of an agreement for that purpose, though without any new consideration, shall extinguish such obligation, promise, or undertaking.

History.

Code 1919, § 5765.

Cross references.

As to compromise of claim for death by wrongful act, see §§

8.01-51

and

8.01-55

.

As to compromises relating to persons under disability and fiduciaries, see §§

8.01-424

and

8.01-425

.

For accord and satisfaction by use of an instrument, see §

8.3A-311

.

Law Review.

For discussion of settlement for less than the creditor’s claim under this section, see 53 Va. L. Rev. 1220 (1967).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Accord and Satisfaction, §§ 4, 6; 4A M.J. Compromise and Settlement, § 8; 4A M.J. Contracts, § 34; 14B M.J. Payment, §§ 4, 18.

§ 11-13.
Right of contribution not affected.

Nothing contained in §§

11-10

through

11-12

shall affect or impair the right of contribution between joint contractors and co-obligors.

History.

Code 1919, § 5766.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Contribution and Exoneration, § 10.